Massachusetts, session 194th, H2282.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.
Section 81Q of chapter 41 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “way” in line 39 the following:–
provided, however, that any rule or regulation so adopted shall allow dead end ways
providing a minimum pavement width of 20 feet and with a turnaround, but shall not limit the
length of such dead end to less than 1,200 feet or as specified by the State Fire Code as set forth
in the National Fire Prevention Association (NFPA) Code 1 and Publication 1141, as amended
(527 CMR 1.00), whichever length is shorter.
SECTION 2.
Any existing rule or regulation promulgated under the subdivision control law shall
comply with this act by January 31, 2026 and until such time be waived by the planning board.
of 1